portugues.affix
#-----------------------------------------
# inha
flag *h:            # "CAT=a_nc,N=s"      #inha
[^CGÇÃI]O   >     -O,INHA         # "G=f,GR=dim"  # maroto->marotinha
[^ÇG]A      >     -A,INHA         # "G=f,GR=dim"  # depressa->depressinha
C O         >    -CO,QUINHA       # "G=f,GR=dim"  # porco->porquinha
Ç O         >    -ÇO,CINHA        # "G=f,GR=dim"  # moc,o->mocinha
G O         >     -O,UINHA        # "G=f,GR=dim"  # antigo->antiguinha
C A         >    -CA,QUINHA       # "G=f,GR=dim"  # vaca->vaquinha
Ç A         >    -ÇA,CINHA        # "G=f,GR=dim"  # cabeça->cabecinha
G A         >     -A,UINHA        # "G=f,GR=dim"  # carga->carguinha
Á           >     -Á,AZINHA       # "G=f,GR=dim"  # pá->pazinha
Ã           >     -Ã,AZINHA       # "G=f,GR=dim"  # mamã->mamazinha
Ã E         >        ZINHA        # "G=f,GR=dim"  # mãe->mãezinha
[^Ã] E      >     -E,INHA         # "G=f,GR=dim"  # carne->carninha
[IRUNL]      >        ZINHA       # "G=f,GR=dim"  # colher->colherzinha
M           >     -M,NZINHA       # "G=m,GR=dim"  # jovenzinha
[^CGÇÃI]O   >     -O,INHAS        # "G=f,N=p,GR=dim"  # maroto->marotinhas
[^ÇG]A      >     -A,INHAS        # "G=f,N=p,GR=dim"  # depressa->depressinhas
C A         >    -CA,QUINHAS      # "G=f,N=p,GR=dim"      # vaca->vaquinhas
Ç A         >    -ÇA,CINHAS       # "G=f,N=p,GR=dim"  # cabeça->cabecinhas
G A         >     -A,UINHAS       # "G=f,N=p,GR=dim"  # carga->carguinhas
C O         >    -CO,QUINHAS      # "G=f,N=p,GR=dim"  # porco->porquinha
Ç O         >    -ÇO,CINHAS       # "G=f,N=p,GR=dim"  # moc,o->macinha
G O         >     -O,UINHAS       # "G=f,N=p,GR=dim"  # antigo->antiguinha
Á           >     -Á,AZINHAS      # "G=f,N=p,GR=dim"  # pá->pazinhas
Ã           >     -Ã,AZINHAS      # "G=f,N=p,GR=dim"  # mamã->mamazinhas
[^Ã] E      >     -E,INHAS        # "G=f,N=p,GR=dim"  # carne->carninha
[IRUNL]      >        ZINHAS      # "G=f,N=p,GR=dim"  # colher->colherzinhas
M           >     -M,NZINHAS      # "G=m,N=p,GR=dim"  # jovenzinhas
flag *z:         # "CAT=a_nc,N=s"      #inho irregular
[^Ã][EO]	>        ZINHO        # "GR=dim"  # pobre->pobrezinho
L	        >    	INHO	      # "GR=dim"	# casal->casalinho
[^Ã][EO]	>        ZINHA        # "G=f,GR=dim"  # pobre->pobrezinho
L	        >	INHA	          # "G=f,GR=dim"	# 
Ã O         >   ZINHO             # "GR=dim"      # cãozinho
[^Ã][EO]    >        ZINHOS       # "N=p,GR=dim"  # pobre->pobrezinhos
L           >        INHOS        # "N=p,GR=dim"  # casal->casalinhos
Ã O         >  -O,EZINHOS         # "N=p,GR=dim"  # cãezinhos
#---------------------------------------
# ção
flag *c:                 # "CAT=v,T=inf"      # çao
[AE] R      >   -R,ÇÃO     # "CAT=nc,G=f,N=s,FSEM=cao"  # inalar->inalação
[^ZG] I R   >   -R,ÇÃO     # "CAT=nc,G=f,N=s,FSEM=cao"  # abolir->abolição
Z I R       > -ZIR,ÇÃO     # "CAT=nc,G=f,N=s,FSEM=cao"  # seduzir->sedução
P O R       >   -R,SIÇÃO   # "CAT=nc,G=f,N=s,FSEM=cao"  # expor->exposição
[AE] R      >   -R,ÇÕES    # "CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=cao"  # inalar->inalações
[^ZG] I R   >   -R,ÇÕES    # "CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=cao"  # abolir->abolições
Z I R       > -ZIR,ÇÕES    # "CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=cao"  # seduzir->seduções
P O R       >   -R,SIÇÕES  # "CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=cao"  # expor->exposições
flag *C:                 # "CAT=v,T=inf" #cao
#T A R       >   -TAR,ÇÃO   # "CAT=nc,G=f,N=s,FSEM=cao"  # cantar->canção
C I O N A R > -IONAR,ÇÃO   # "CAT=nc,G=f,N=s,FSEM=cao"  # adicionar->adição
A I R       >    -IR,CÇÃO  # "CAT=nc,G=f,N=s,FSEM=cao"  # atrair->atracção
U I R       >    -IR,ÇÃO   # "CAT=nc,G=f,N=s,FSEM=cao"  # evoluir->evolução
#T A R       >   -TAR,ÇÕES  # "CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=cao"  # cantar->canções
C I O N A R > -IONAR,ÇÕES  # "CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=cao"  # adicionar->adições
A I R       >    -IR,CÇÕES # "CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=cao"  # atrair->atracções
U I R       >    -IR,ÇÕES  # "CAT=nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=cao"  # evoluir->evoluções
#---------------------------------------
# mento
flag *M:                 # "CAT=v,T=inf"      #mento
[AI] R      >  -R,MENTO   #"CAT=nc,G=m,N=s,FSEM=mento" # acumular->acumulamento
E R         > -ER,IMENTO  #"CAT=nc,G=m,N=s,FSEM=mento" # sofrer->sofrimento
[AI] R      >  -R,MENTOS  #"CAT=nc,G=m,N=p,FSEM=mento" # acumular->acumulamentos
E R         > -ER,IMENTOS #"CAT=nc,G=m,N=p,FSEM=mento" # sofrer->sofrimentos
#---------------------------------------
# nte
flag *n:                # "CAT=v,T=inf"       #ente
[AE] R      >   -R,NTE        # "CAT=adj,G=_,N=s,FSEM=nte"  # lavar->lavante
I R         >  -IR,ENTE       # "CAT=adj,G=_,N=s,FSEM=nte"  # aderir->aderente
O R         >   -R,NENTE      # "CAT=adj,G=_,N=s,FSEM=nte"  # opor->oponente
[AE] R      >   -R,NTES       # "CAT=adj,G=_,N=p,FSEM=nte"  # lavar->lavantes
I R         >  -IR,ENTES      # "CAT=adj,G=_,N=p,FSEM=nte"  # aderir->aderentes
O R         >   -R,NENTES     # "CAT=adj,G=_,N=p,FSEM=nte"  # opor->oponentes
#---------------------------------------
# *dor
flag *D:                 # "CAT=v,T=inf"     #dor
[AEI] R     >   -R,DOR        # "CAT=a_nc,G=m,N=s,FSEM=dor" # lavrar->lavrador
[AEI] R     >   -R,DORA       # "CAT=a_nc,G=f,N=s,FSEM=dor" # lavrar->lavradora
[AEI] R     >   -R,DORES      # "CAT=a_nc,G=m,N=p,FSEM=dor" # lavrar->lavradores
[AEI] R     >   -R,DORAS      # "CAT=a_nc,G=f,N=p,FSEM=dor" # lavrar->lavradoras
#---------------------------------------
# ível, ável           verb2adj
flag *v:                  # "CAT=v,T=inf"    #ável
A R         >    -AR,ÁVEL    # "CAT=adj,G=_,N=s,FSEM=vel"  # lavar->lavável
E R         >    -ER,ÍVEL    # "CAT=adj,G=_,N=s,FSEM=vel"  # amover->amovível
I R         >    -IR,ÍVEL    # "CAT=adj,G=_,N=s,FSEM=vel"  # auferir->auferível
A R         >    -AR,ÁVEIS   # "CAT=adj,G=_,N=p,FSEM=vel"  # lavar->laváveis
E R         >    -ER,ÍVEIS   # "CAT=adj,G=_,N=p,FSEM=vel"  # amover->amovíveis
I R         >    -IR,ÍVEIS   # "CAT=adj,G=_,N=p,FSEM=vel"  # auferir->auferíveis
