portugues.dict
abater/XYMD
aborrecer/XYMDv
abrasar/XYMn
absorver/XYDnv
acamar/XYcM
aceitar/XYcMDnvB
acetinar/XYcD
acidentar/XYcv
acirrar/XYMn
acomodar/XYScMv
acrescentar/XYM
acutilar/XYMD
adiar/XYMnv
adivinhar/XYcD
afamar/XYD
afastar/XYMD
afiliar/XYc
afinfar/XYDn
afolhar/XYM
afunilar/XYM
agradar/XYSv
agradecer/XYRMvB
agravar/XYSMn
aguardar/XYD
agulha/ph
ajoujar/XYM
ajuda/ph
alcatroar/XYM
alcoolizar/XYcv
alienar/XYcMnv
alinhar/XYMDR
altear/ZYMD
alternar/XYcDnv
alugar/XYMDvu
amarrar/XYScD
amolar/XYcD
amolgar/XYSMv
amplificar/XYcDv
angustiar/XYDnB
aniquilar/XYcMD
anotar/XYcD
apancar/XYM
aparvoar/XYM
apavorar/XYMDn
aperceber/XYSM
aplanar/XYcD
aplaudir/XYv
apoquentar/XYcD
apoucar/XYM
aprisionar/XYM
aquecer/XYMDvR
arar/XYDv
arfar/XYn
argola/h
argumentar/XYcDn
arquear/ZYcMD
arranjado/ph
arrasar/XYD
arrecadar/XYcMD
arrogar/XYcDn
arrolhar/XYMD
arrugar/XYM
articular/mpXYcnvDBS
asseverar/XYcDn
assoberbar/XYMn
associar/XYcv
assolar/XYcMD
atar/XYcMD
aterrar/XYD
atordoar/XYMDn
atualizar/XYRDcv
auferir/ZYv
augurar/XYc
avassalar/XYDn
ave/ptz
avisar/XYD
azedar/XYMD
azul/pz
balnear/pcv
baralhar/XYMD
barba/ph
barbarizar/XYcn
barra/h
beneficiar/XYcMDv
bobinar/XYDR
boca/ph
boiar/Yn
bola/ph
bomba/pth
bombear/ZYM
boneca/h
bonificar/XYc
burocratizar/XYcDS
buscar/XYDn
cachorra/ph
cadeira/ph
calejar/XYMD
caminhar/XYDn
canalizar/XYcDv
cantar/XYDnv
capela/ph
capitalizar/XYcvSR
carnificar/XYc
cascalho/h
catalogar/XYcD
catequizar/XYcDn
celebrar/XYcDnv
censurar/XYDv
centrifugar/XYcD
chalacear/ZYD
chatear/ZYcM
chirriar/XYn
citar/XYcDnv
civilizar/XYcDv
clarificar/XYcD
cobrar/XYDv
coibir/Yc
coindicar/XYcn
coisa/hp
colher/phXYM
combinar/XYcDvR
comensurar/XYcv
comover/XYDn
compaginar/XYc
comprometer/XYMDS
comprovar/XYcDnBv
compungir/XYM
comunitarizar/XYnc
concentrar/XYcDv
condicionar/XYMDn
configurar/XYRScv
confranger/XYMDn
congeminar/XYcn
conjurar/XYcDn
conquistar/XYDv
consagrar/XYRScDnv
conspirar/XYcDn
constar/XYn
constatar/XYcv
constituir/KcDvR
contemplar/XYcDnv
conter/n
contornar/XYM
contrastar/XYcDnv
contratar/XYRSDnvcu
contribuir/KcDn
controlar/XYSDvB
corar/XYn
corporificar/XYc
corromper/XYMD
cozinhar/XYv
crer/YSDn
cronometrar/XYc
crucificar/XYcD
cruzar/XYMDnv
cursar/XYv
deambular/XYcn
debelar/XYcD
decifrar/XYcMDv
decrescer/XYMn
deferir/ZYMv
deflagrar/XYcDn
defrontar/XYcn
deleitar/XYcMnv
deliberar/XYcn
democratizar/XYc
demonstrar/XYcDnv
denominar/XYcD
deprimir/XYn
derramar/XYcMD
desagastar/XYM
desaguar/YMD
desavisar/XYM
desbordar/XYn
descarregar/XYMD
desconcentrar/XYc
desconfortar/XYnv
desencadear/ZYMnD
desesperar/XYcBDn
desfigurar/XYcDv
desfolhar/XYcMD
desintegrar/XYc
desmoralizar/XYcDn
desorganizar/XYcD
despachar/XYDn
despenhar/XYM
destratar/XYMDnv
destruir/cDvS
desvanecer/XYMDv
desvenerar/XYc
desvirginar/XYM
devassar/XYMDv
difamar/XYcDn
diferenciar/XYcD
diligenciar/XYD
discrepar/XYn
discutir/XYDv
dissecar/XYcDn
distribuir/KcDv
diversificar/XYDcnv
dobrada/hp
documentar/XYcv
dominar/XYcDnv
dotar/XYcD
doutorar/XYM
efetuar/XYcD
ejetar/XYv
eletrizar/XYcDnv
embirrar/XYcn
embravecer/XYM
emigrar/XYcDn
empalear/ZYD
empenar/XYSM
encalacrar/XYcD
encanar/XYM
encenar/XYcDR
encolher/XYM
encriptar/XYcvS
enfadar/XYM
enfardar/XYMD
enfunilar/XYM
enlouquecer/XYM
enrodilhar/XYD
ensacar/XYM
entravar/XYM
enublar/XYc
envenenar/XYMD
envolver/XYMn
equiparar/XYcv
equivaler/Yn
escada/ph
esclarecer/XYMD
escoar/XYcMDn
escriturar/XYc
escusar/XYv
esganar/XYcD
esmorecer/XYM
espreitar/XYDn
espumar/XYn
estagnar/XYcMDn
estatizar/XYnc
estremar/XYv
evacuar/XYcn
evaporar/XYcnv
exaltar/XYcMDn
excitar/XYcMDnv
execrar/XYcDv
exonerar/XYc
explicitar/XYvc
expropriar/XYcD
extenuar/XYcDn
extremar/XYv
fada/ph
fala/ph
fanatizar/XYD
farolizar/XYc
fertilizar/XYcDnv
festa/ph
figurar/XYcnv
filtrar/XYcMDn
firmar/XYcMD
formular/pXYcDR
fulanizar/XYnc
fulminar/XYcDn
fumar/XYDv
garrafa/ph
gerar/XYcD
germanizar/XYc
globalizar/XYnc
golear/ZYMD
governar/XYcDnv
habitar/XYScDnv
hidratar/XYScnv
horripilar/XYcDn
hospitalizar/XYc
igualar/XYScMDv
imiscuir/Kc
impressionar/XYDnv
improceder/XYn
impugnar/XYcDv
incendiar/Yv
incensar/XYcD
incorrer/XYM
incrementar/XYc
indemnizar/XYcDv
industrializar/XYcRS
infringir/XYv
iniciar/XYcDn
insalivar/XYc
inspecionar/XYD
insubordinar/XYcDvB
interpretar/XYcDnvR
inutilizar/XYcv
ionizar/XYcn
isolar/XYcMDn
iterar/XYcvD
janela/ph
julgar/XYMD
lacerar/XYcnv
laminar/pvXYcD
laranja/ph
letra/pth
limitar/XYcnvDB
linear/pmdM
liquidar/XYcDv
liquidificar/XYcnv
louvar/XYcMDv
mala/ph
manobrar/XYDv
marchar/XYDn
matraquear/ZYD
mediatizar/XYc
menear/ZYMDv
merecer/XYSMDB
mesa/ph
moda/ph
modelizar/XYnc
moderar/XYcDnvB
modernizar/XYc
moer/MD
mumificar/XYcDnv
mutilar/XYcDn
negociar/YcMDnvR
nevar/Yc
notificar/XYcDn
objetivar/XYcnv
observar/XYcDnv
olhada/h
ondear/ZYMn
orientar/XYScDR
oxigenar/XYcnv
padrear/ZYcD
pagar/XYMDnvE
palavra/ph
palmada/ph
papa/php
partidarizar/XYncS
partir/XYcMDv
pedra/pth
pejar/XYM
pelada/ph
penalizar/XYcnDS
perdurar/XYcnv
perfilhar/XYcMDn
perturbar/XYcDnv
pessoalizar/XYnc
pinga/ph
planificar/XYcv
poupar/XYD
pratear/ZYcM
praticar/XYDnv
preceder/XYn
prefixar/XYc
prenda/ph
procrastinar/XYcDv
prodigalizar/XYD
profissionalizar/XYnc
pronunciar/XYcMv
propiciar/XYcDv
provir/M
punir/XYcDv
qualificar/XYcDvRE
querer/n
quinta/ph
radicalizar/XYnc
rapariga/ph
razoar/XYMv
rebaixar/XYM
recalcificar/XYcDn
recompensar/XYcDv
recrescer/XYMn
redondo/fmplh
reduplicar/XYc
referir/ZYMv
refolhar/XYM
regozijar/XYD
rejeitar/XYv
relaxar/XYcMDn
remediar/YScDv
remover/XYMv
renhir/XYM
reproduzir/ZYv
requisitar/XYnD
respeitar/XYDnB
restituir/KcDv
retornar/XYMv
revivificar/XYcD
revogar/XYcDnv
ribeira/ph
roda/ph
sair/Kn
salivar/pXYcn
sambar/XYD
sanear/ZYMDv
saturar/XYcDnv
serpear/ZYn
sindicar/XYcD
sintonizar/XYcS
solver/XYnv
sopa/ph
soterrar/XYcM
sugar/XYcD
sulfurar/XYcDv
sussurrar/XYnD
sustentar/XYcMDnv
talar/XYMD
tasca/ph
tintinar/XYn
tiranizar/XYD
toalha/ph
todo/pflh
torvar/XYcM
tragar/XYMDv
transformar/XYcDnv
tratar/XYMDnv
tremer/XYDn
unir/XYv
universalizar/XYc
urdir/XYMD
vaca/ph
valorizar/XYScRun
vaporizar/XYcD
vermelho/pflh
vincular/XYDnvc
virar/XYMD
vitrificar/XYcv
adelgaçar/XYMD
ameaçar/XYDn
aperfeiçoar/XYMD
criança/pGh
deslaçar/XYM
graça/ph
moço/fplh
traçar/XYMD
